Indiana, session 2026, SB59.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-4-3-1.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.70-2022,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.7. (a) This section applies only to an annexation
ordinance adopted after June 30, 2015. This section does not apply to
an annexation under section 5.1 of this chapter.
(b) Not earlier than six (6) months before a municipality introduces
an annexation ordinance, the municipality shall conduct an outreach
program to inform citizens regarding the proposed annexation. For an
annexation under section 3 or 4 of this chapter, the outreach program
must conduct at least six (6) public information meetings regarding the
proposed annexation. For an annexation under section 5 or 5.2 of this
chapter, the outreach program must conduct at least three (3) public
information meetings regarding the proposed annexation. The public
information meetings must provide citizens with the following
information:
(1) Maps showing the proposed boundaries of the annexation
territory.
(2) Proposed plans for extension of capital and noncapital
services in the annexation territory, including proposed dates of
extension. In the case of an annexation under section 5.2 of this
chapter, a copy of the preliminary written fiscal plan.
(3) Expected fiscal impact on taxpayers in the annexation
SEA 59

2
territory, including any increase in taxes and fees.
(c) The municipality shall provide notice of the dates, times, and
locations of the outreach program meetings. The municipality shall do
all of the following:
(1) Publish the notice of the meetings under IC 5-3-1, including
the date, time, and location of the meetings, except that notice
must be published not later than thirty (30) days before the date
of each meeting.
(2) The municipality shall also Send notice under subsection (d)
to each owner of land within the annexation territory not later
than thirty (30) days before the date of the first meeting of the
outreach program.
(3) Send notice by first class mail, certified mail with return
receipt requested, or any other means of delivery that
includes a return receipt not later than thirty (30) days before
the date of the first meeting of the outreach program to:
(A) the county executive body of each county;
(B) the township executive of each township; and
(C) any plan commission;
in which the annexation territory is located. The notice must
provide the date, time, and location of the meetings to be
conducted under the outreach program.
(d) The notice to landowners shall be sent by first class mail,
certified mail with return receipt requested, or any other means of
delivery that includes a return receipt and must include the following
information:
(1) The notice must inform the landowner that the municipality is
proposing to annex territory that includes the landowner's
property.
(2) The municipality is conducting an outreach program for the
purpose of providing information to landowners and the public
regarding the proposed annexation.
(3) The date, time, and location of the meetings to be conducted
under the outreach program.
(d) (e) The notice shall be sent to the address of the landowner as
listed on the tax duplicate. If the municipality provides evidence that
the notice was sent:
(1) by certified mail, with return receipt requested or any other
means of delivery that includes a return receipt; and
(2) in accordance with this section;
it is not necessary that the landowner accept receipt of the notice. If a
remonstrance is filed under section 11 of this chapter, the municipality
SEA 59

3
shall file with the court proof that notices were sent to landowners
under this section and proof of publication.
(e) (f) The notice required under this section is in addition to any
notice required under sections 2.1 and 2.2 of this chapter.
SEA 59

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 59